Colorado statutes. TITLE 7 Corporations and Associations
PART 1
SHORT TITLE AND RESERVATION OF POWER

7-121-101. Short title.

Articles 121 to 137 of this title shall be known and may be cited as the "Colorado Revised Nonprofit Corporation Act".

Source:

L. 97:

Entire article added, p. 646, § 3, effective July 1, 1998.

7-121-102. Reservation of power to amend or repeal.

The general assembly has the power to amend or repeal all or part of articles 121 to 137 of this title at any time and all domestic and foreign nonprofit corporations subject to said articles shall be governed by the amendment or repeal.

Source:

L. 97:

Entire article added, p. 646, § 3, effective July 1, 1998.